src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_HIUTALEET
!!€gt-norm:  Noun  leat plurt
!!€  hiutaleet: hiutaleet+N+Pl+Nom # flakes
!!$  hiutale: hiutaleet+N+Sg+Nom
0:e  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:e  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:e  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:e  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:e  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
0:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
0:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_VÄLINEET
!!€gt-norm:  Noun  eet plurt
!!€  välineet: välineet+N+Pl+Nom # tools
!!$  väline:   välineet+N+Sg+Nom
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
+Use/NG:0  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:e  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:e  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;
0  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
0:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
0:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_ALKEET
!!€gt-norm:  Noun  jeet plurt
!!€  alkeet: alkeet+N+Pl+Nom # basics
!!$  alje: alkeet+N+Sg+Nom
0:kee  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:ke  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:ke  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ke  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ke  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ke  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ke  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:je  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:kee  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ke  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
0:ke  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_PERKEET
!!€gt-norm:  Noun  jeat plurt
!!€  perkeet: perkeet+N+Pl+Nom fish scales and guts
!!$  perje: perkeet+N+Sg+Nom
0:kee  NOUN_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:ke  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ke  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:ke  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ke  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ke  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0:ke  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:je  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:kee  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ke  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
0:ke  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_POJAT
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 10 pojat plurt
!!€  pojat: pojat+N+Pl+Nom # boys
!!$  poika: pojat+N+Sg+Nom
0:ja  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:ik  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:j  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ik  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:ik  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
+Use/NG:ika  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:ik  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:ika  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
0:ja  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;
0:ik  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;
0:ika  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;


!  Note: The lexica from here and down were found
!  missing on 31.12.13. First I assumed there were
!  some occational holes, and I made the first two
!  based upon the corresponding singular ones.
!  Then I saw there were over 100 lexica missing, and
!  I just added them as empty lexica.

!  I suspect there is a file or a major update missing
!  here, so look into this. Trond.













LEXICON NOUN_KILPIKKÄÄT

+Use/NG:kähä  NOUN_FRONT_PLNOM_ARCHAIC_CLIT  ;
+Use/NG:kähä  NOUN_FRONT_PLNOM_ARCHAIC_POSS  ;

:kä  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
:kä  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
:kä  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:kä  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:kä  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
:kä  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
:kä  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
:kä  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

:kää  NOUN_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
:kää  NOUN_FRONT_PLNOM_POSS  ;
:kää  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;

+Use/NG:äs  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN_ARCHAIC  ;
:äs  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;

LEXICON NOUN_MILJÖÖT

:  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
:  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
:  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
:  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
:  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
:  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN  ;
:  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN  ;

:ö  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
:ö  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;


LEXICON NOUN_PINSETIT

:e  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;

:i  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
:i  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;

:te  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
:te  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
:te  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;

:ti  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_POSS  ;
:ti  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;

:t  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:t  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_ROHTIMET

:din  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
:din  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
:din  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;

:time  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
:time  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_POSS  ;
:time  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;

:tim  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS  ;
:tim  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
:tim  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:tim  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
:tim  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_ROTAT
!!€gt-norm:  Noun 9 t~0 plurt
:a  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;

:o  NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;

:ta  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_POSS  ;
:ta  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
:ta  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
:ta  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN  ;

:to  NOUN_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
:to  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
:to  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
:to  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
:to  NOUN_COMPOUND_JEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_VETIMET

:din  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
:din  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;
:din  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;

:time  NOUN_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
:time  NOUN_FRONT_PLNOM_POSS  ;
:time  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;

:tim  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
:tim  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
:tim  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:tim  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
:tim  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;

LEXICON NOUN_VIRRET

:re  NOUN_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
:re  NOUN_COMPOUND_N  ;

:si  NOUN_COMPOUND_0  ;

:s  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
:s  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
:s  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
:s  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
:s  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN  ;

:te  NOUN_FRONT_PLNOM_POSS  ;

:t  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN  ;
:t  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN  ;





! This is autogenerated from omorfi new pluratives and propN's, subject
! to change very soon

LEXICON NOUN_FÄNRIKIT

:e  NOUN_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS ;

:i  NOUN_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT ;
i:i  NOUN_COMPOUND_N ;

:ke  NOUN_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
:ke  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ ;
:ke  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

:ki  NOUN_FRONT_PLNOM_POSS ;
ki:ki  NOUN_COMPOUND_0 ;

:k  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN ;
k:k  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN ;


LEXICON NOUN_HAIT

:i  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT ;
:i  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_POSS ;
i:i  NOUN_COMPOUND_0 ;
i:i  NOUN_COMPOUND_N ;

:  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS ;
:  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
:  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
+Use/NG:  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
:  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
:  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
:  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN ;





LEXICON NOUN_HÄRKIN

:in  NOUN_FRONT_NOMINATIVE ;
:in  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ ;
:in  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN ;
in:in  NOUN_COMPOUND_0 ;
in:in  NOUN_COMPOUND_TEN ;

:kime  NOUN_FRONT_SINGULARS ;
:kime  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
kime:kime  NOUN_COMPOUND_N ;

:kim  NOUN_FRONT_PLURALS ;
:kim  NOUN_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ ;
:kim  NOUN_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN ;
:kim  NOUN_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN ;
kim:kim  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN ;


LEXICON NOUN_KANAALI

:e  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS ;
:e  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;
:e  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
:e  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
+Use/NG:e  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
:e  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;
e:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
e:e  NOUN_COMPOUND_ITTEN ;

:i  NOUN_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
:i  NOUN_BACK_SINGULARS ;
:i  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN ;
:i  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;
i:i  NOUN_COMPOUND_0 ;
i:i  NOUN_COMPOUND_N ;

:  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN ;
:  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN ;


LEXICON NOUN_KASTILJAT

:a  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT ;
:a  NOUN_BACK_PLNOM_POSS ;
:a  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ;
a:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_0 ;
a:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_N ;
a:a  NOUN_COMPOUND_IN ;

:  NOUN_BACK_PLURALS ;
:  NOUN_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA ;
:  NOUN_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN ;
:  NOUN_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN ;
:  NOUN_COMPOUND_IEN ;
