src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_Cmp
ai-ait+N:ai-a  NOUN_HAIT  ;
akseli+N:aksel  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
aktiivat+N:aktiiv  NOUN_KASTILJAT  ;
alkeet+N:al  NOUN_ALKEET  ;
ammattitoveri+N:ammattitover  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
askomykeetit+N:askomykeet  NOUN_PINSETIT  ;
australianhypikkäät+N:australianhypik  NOUN_KILPIKKÄÄT  ;
australiantupsurotat+N:australiantupsurot  NOUN_ROTAT  ;
avistavekseli+N:avistaveksel  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
beringinhylkeet+N:beringinhyl  NOUN_PERKEET  ;
bofori+N:bofor  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
demari+N:demar  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
enkelinkiharat+N:enkelin#kihar  NOUN_KASTILJAT  ;
enkelinkiharat+N:enkelinkihar  NOUN_KASTILJAT  ;
enterobakteeri+N:enterobakteer  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
eteläamerikanisohylkeet+N:eteläamerikanisohyl  NOUN_ALKEET  ;
eteläamerikanisohylkeet+N:eteläamerikanisohyl  NOUN_PERKEET  ;
geenimuunnosvektori+N:geenimuunnosvektor  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
härkin+N:härki  NOUN_HÄRKIN  ;
harteet+N:harte  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
helsinkiläismiljööt+N:helsinkiläismiljö  NOUN_MILJÖÖT  ;
hepoasteet+N:hepo#aste  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
hepoasteet+N:hepoaste  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
hiekkapaperi+N:hiekka#paper  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
hohtimet+N:hoh  NOUN_ROHTIMET  ;
ikätoveri+N:ikätover  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
jättiläiskalmari+N:jättiläiskalmar  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
kahmari+N:kahmar  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
kaksospojat+N:kaksos#po  NOUN_POJAT  ;
kaksospojat+N:kaksospo  NOUN_POJAT  ;
kalanperkeet+N:kalan#per  NOUN_PERKEET  ;
kalanperkeet+N:kalanper  NOUN_PERKEET  ;
kartturi+N:karttur  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
kastiljat+N:kastilj  NOUN_KASTILJAT  ;
kengurotat+N:kengurot  NOUN_ROTAT  ;
kenttämittari+N:kenttämittar  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
kilpikkäät+N:kilpik  NOUN_KILPIKKÄÄT  ;
kimikit+N:kimik  NOUN_FÄNRIKIT  ;
kimmomoduuli+N:kimmo#moduul  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
kolmospojat+N:kolmos#po  NOUN_POJAT  ;
kolmospojat+N:kolmospo  NOUN_POJAT  ;
konserttimestari+N:konsertti#mestar  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
kunnallispormestari+N:kunnallis#pormestar  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
lämpöpaperi+N:lämpöpaper  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
lihamittari+N:liha#mittar  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
maastapoistumisviisumi+N:maastapoistumisviisum  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
metildigoksiini+N:metildigoksiin  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
multahirret+N:multahir NOUN_VIRRET ;
mustalaisorkesteri+N:mustalaisorkester  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
nopeusmittari+N:nopeus#mittar  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
nyyttikestit+N:nyytti#kest  NOUN_PINSETIT  ;
nyyttikestit+N:nyyttikest  NOUN_PINSETIT  ;
osteri+N:oster  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
passari+N:passar  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
piirinmestari+N:piirin#mestar  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
pikahiutaleet+N:pika#hiutale  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
pikahiutaleet+N:pikahiutale  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
pinsetit+N:pinset  NOUN_PINSETIT  ;
popliini+N:popliin  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
pulssianalysaattori+N:pulssi#analysaattor  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
pyhätamineet+N:pyhä#tamine  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
pyhätamineet+N:pyhätamine  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
pyrstökkäät+N:pyrstök  NOUN_KILPIKKÄÄT  ;
radionauhuri+N:radionauhur  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
rahkeet+N:rah  NOUN_ALKEET  ;
rapukestit+N:rapu#kest  NOUN_PINSETIT  ;
rapukestit+N:rapukest  NOUN_PINSETIT  ;
retkijalkineet+N:retkijalkine  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
retkivarusteet+N:retkivaruste  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
riitapukari+N:riitapukar  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
rohtimet+N:roh  NOUN_ROHTIMET  ;
ruokailuvälineet+N:ruokailu#väline NOUN_VÄLINEET ;
safari+N:safar  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
saniteettikalusteet+N:saniteettikaluste  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
sahaheltat+N:saha#helt NOUN_ROTAT ;
sataheltat+N:sata#helt NOUN_ROTAT ;
seitikit+N:seitik NOUN_FÄNRIKIT ;
seksisymboli+N:seksi#symbol  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
sipulihiutaleet+N:sipuli#hiutale  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
sipulihiutaleet+N:sipulihiutale  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
siveydensipuli+N:siveyden#sipul  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
skinkit+N:skink  NOUN_FÄNRIKIT  ;
suihkari+N:suihkar  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
tähtimoottori+N:tähtimoottor  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
tamineet+N:tamine  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
telamaasturi+N:telamaastur  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
triangeli+N:triangel  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
tuomarinohjeet+N:tuomarin#ohje  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
tuomarinohjeet+N:tuomarinohje  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
tuulimittari+N:tuulimittar  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
ulkoiluvarusteet+N:ulkoilu#varuste  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
ulkoiluvarusteet+N:ulkoiluvaruste  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
utareet+N:utare  NOUN_HIUTALEET  ;
valitusvirret+N:valitus#vir  NOUN_VIRRET  ;
valitusvirret+N:valitusvir  NOUN_VIRRET  ;
valkohikkori+N:valko#hikkor  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
vedenkorkeusmittari+N:vedenkorkeus#mittar  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
vetimet+N:ve  NOUN_VETIMET  ;
villasatiini+N:villasatiin  NOUN_KANAALI  ;
ruuvinosturi+N:ruuvi#nostur NOUN_KANAALI ; ! nouns.lexc NOUN
